test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kualus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kuálus: # ok, MLO 
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuáḷus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuálˊlusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuálˊlusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuálˊlusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuálˊlusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuáˊḷusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuáˊḷusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuálˊluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuálˊlusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuálˊlusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuálˊlusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuálˊlusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuálˊlusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuálˊlusijttáá
